Tennessee statutes. Title 35 Fiduciaries And Trust Estates
Part 1

Uniform Management of Institutional Funds Act of 1973 [Repealed]

35-10-101. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former Part 1, §§ 35-10-101 — 35-10-109 (Acts 1973, ch. 177, §§ 1-8, 10; T.C.A., §§ 35-1101 — 35-1109), concerning the Uniform Management of Institutional Funds Act of 1973, was repealed by Acts 2007, ch. 186, § 11(a), effective July 1, 2007.

35-10-102. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former Part 1, §§ 35-10-101 — 35-10-109 (Acts 1973, ch. 177, §§ 1-8, 10; T.C.A., §§ 35-1101 — 35-1109), concerning the Uniform Management of Institutional Funds Act of 1973, was repealed by Acts 2007, ch. 186, § 11(a), effective July 1, 2007.

35-10-103. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former Part 1, §§ 35-10-101 — 35-10-109 (Acts 1973, ch. 177, §§ 1-8, 10; T.C.A., §§ 35-1101 — 35-1109), concerning the Uniform Management of Institutional Funds Act of 1973, was repealed by Acts 2007, ch. 186, § 11(a), effective July 1, 2007.

35-10-104. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former Part 1, §§ 35-10-101 — 35-10-109 (Acts 1973, ch. 177, §§ 1-8, 10; T.C.A., §§ 35-1101 — 35-1109), concerning the Uniform Management of Institutional Funds Act of 1973, was repealed by Acts 2007, ch. 186, § 11(a), effective July 1, 2007.

35-10-105. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former Part 1, §§ 35-10-101 — 35-10-109 (Acts 1973, ch. 177, §§ 1-8, 10; T.C.A., §§ 35-1101 — 35-1109), concerning the Uniform Management of Institutional Funds Act of 1973, was repealed by Acts 2007, ch. 186, § 11(a), effective July 1, 2007.

35-10-106. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former Part 1, §§ 35-10-101 — 35-10-109 (Acts 1973, ch. 177, §§ 1-8, 10; T.C.A., §§ 35-1101 — 35-1109), concerning the Uniform Management of Institutional Funds Act of 1973, was repealed by Acts 2007, ch. 186, § 11(a), effective July 1, 2007.

35-10-107. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former Part 1, §§ 35-10-101 — 35-10-109 (Acts 1973, ch. 177, §§ 1-8, 10; T.C.A., §§ 35-1101 — 35-1109), concerning the Uniform Management of Institutional Funds Act of 1973, was repealed by Acts 2007, ch. 186, § 11(a), effective July 1, 2007.

35-10-108. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former Part 1, §§ 35-10-101 — 35-10-109 (Acts 1973, ch. 177, §§ 1-8, 10; T.C.A., §§ 35-1101 — 35-1109), concerning the Uniform Management of Institutional Funds Act of 1973, was repealed by Acts 2007, ch. 186, § 11(a), effective July 1, 2007.

35-10-109. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former Part 1, §§ 35-10-101 — 35-10-109 (Acts 1973, ch. 177, §§ 1-8, 10; T.C.A., §§ 35-1101 — 35-1109), concerning the Uniform Management of Institutional Funds Act of 1973, was repealed by Acts 2007, ch. 186, § 11(a), effective July 1, 2007.